src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
! DIVVUN & GIELLATEKNO - OPEN SOURCE GRAMMARS FOR SÁMI AND OTHER LANGUAGES
! COPYRIGHT © 2000-2010 THE UNIVERSITY OF TROMSØ & THE NORWEGIAN SÁMI PARLIAMENT
! HTTP://GIELLATEKNO.UIT.NO & HTTP://DIVVUN.NO
!
! THIS PROGRAM IS FREE SOFTWARE; YOU CAN REDISTRIBUTE AND/OR MODIFY
! THIS FILE UNDER THE TERMS OF THE GNU GENERAL PUBLIC LICENSE AS PUBLISHED BY
! THE FREE SOFTWARE FOUNDATION, EITHER VERSION 3 OF THE LICENSE, OR
! (AT YOUR OPTION) ANY LATER VERSION. THE GNU GENERAL PUBLIC LICENSE
! IS FOUND AT HTTP://WWW.GNU.ORG/LICENSES/GPL.HTML. IT IS
! ALSO AVAILABLE IN THE FILE $GTHOME/LICENSE.TXT.
!
! OTHER LICENSING OPTIONS ARE AVAILABLE UPON REQUEST, PLEASE CONTACT
! GIELLATEKNO@HUM.UIT.NO OR FEEDBACK@DIVVUN.NO

!! !!!SKOLT SAAMI PROPERNOUN MORPHOLOGY 

!LEXICON FIRSTTAG
!! THE LEXICON ''@LEXNAME@'' ASSIGNS THE TAG +N+Prop+Attr
!+N+Prop+Attr: # ;
!!@U.CAP.OBL@+N+Prop+Attr:@U.CAP.OBL@ # ;  FOR REFERENCE: SME ENTRY.


LEXICON PROP_
! THIS LEXICON ''@LEXNAME@'' ASSIGNS THE TAG +N+Prop, AND IS JUST A DUMMY.
+N+Prop: # ;

LEXICON SURNAME_DUMMY
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Com:%>in # ;

LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: # ;

!!
LEXICON PROP_TOP_
PROP_SEM/PLC_ ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_ATOM
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_ATOM ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_CHUOSHKK
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_CHUOSHKK ;

!LEXICON PROP_TOP_SAJOS
!+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
!PROP_SAJOS ;

LEXICON PROP_TOP_AANAR
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_AANAR ;

LEXICON PROP_TOP_JEAQNNN
+N+Prop:%^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
 PROP_JEAQNNN ;

LEXICON PROP_TOP_TAQHTT
+N+Prop:%^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
 PROP_TAQHTT ;

LEXICON PROP_TOP_JEAQRMM
+N+Prop:%^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_JEAQRMM ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_JUEQLGHGH
+N+Prop:%^PALE%^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_JUEQLGHGH ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_JAUQRR
+N+Prop:%^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_JAUQRR ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_KUYLAZH
+N+Prop:až ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_KUYLAZH ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_KUEQLL
+N+Prop:%^PALE%^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_KUEQLL ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_KUSS
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_KUSS ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_KOALVAK
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_KOALVAK ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_KAQLBB
+N+Prop:%^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_KAQLBB ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_KAQLBB-PL
+N+Prop:%^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_KAQLBB-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_LUUBBYL
+N+Prop:%^Pen%^V2VV ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_LUUBBYL ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_MUORR
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_MUORR ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_MAADD
+N+Prop:%^VV2V ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_MAADD ;

LEXICON PROP_TOP_OULU
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_OULU ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_PAARR
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_PAARR ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_PAPP
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_PAPP ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_PESS
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_PESS ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_PLAAN
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_PLAAN ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_PUOAVV
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_PUOAVV ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_ALGG
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_ALGG ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_RUOCCC
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_RUOCCC ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_SIJDD
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_SIJDD ;

LEXICON PROP_TOP_SUYL
+N+Prop:%^VOWLower%^CCC2C ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_SUYL ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_SAAQMM
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_SAAQMM ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_TOLL
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_TOLL ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_TRUUBA
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_TUODDYR
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_TUODDYR ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_SAJOS
+N+Prop: ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_SAJOS ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_VUEAIQVV
+N+Prop:%^PALẸ%^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_VUEAIQVV ;
LEXICON PROP_TOP_LOAQDD
+N+Prop:%^PAL ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM ;
PROP_LOAQDD ;
!!

LEXICON PROP_PAPP
+N+Prop: NMN_PAPP ;
LEXICON PROP_TOLL
+N+Prop: NMN_TOLL ;
LEXICON PROP_PAARR
+N+Prop: NMN_PAARR ;

LEXICON PROP_ALGG
+N+Prop: NMN_ALGG ;
LEXICON PROP_AUTT
+N+Prop: NMN_AUTT ;
!LEXICON PROP_NIJDD
!+N+Prop: NMN_NIJDD ;
LEXICON PROP_PUOAVV
+N+Prop: NMN_PUOAVV ;
LEXICON PROP_MUORR
+N+Prop: NMN_MUORR ;
LEXICON PROP_MAADD
+N+Prop: NMN_MAADD ;
LEXICON PROP_RUOCCC
+N+Prop: NMN_RUOCCC ;


LEXICON PROP_CHUOSHKK
+N+Prop: NMN_CHUOSHKK ;

LEXICON PROP_SAAQMM
+N+Prop: NMN_SAAQMM ;
!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_SAAQMM
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_SAAQMM ;
LEXICON PROP_KUEQLL
+N+Prop: NMN_KUEQLL ;
LEXICON PROP_JUEQLGHGH
+N+Prop: NMN_JUEQLGHGH ;
LEXICON PROP_VUEAIQVV
+N+Prop: NMN_VUEAIQVV ;
LEXICON PROP_JEAQNNN
+N+Prop: NMN_JEAQNNN ;
LEXICON PROP_JEAQRMM
+N+Prop: NMN_JEAQRMM ;
LEXICON PROP_TAQHTT
+N+Prop: NMN_TAQHTT ;

!LEXICON PROP_KHEQRJJ
!+N+Prop: NMN_KHEQRJJ ;

!!
!LEXICON PROP_DIQLL
!+N+Prop: NMN_DIQLL ;
!LEXICON PROP_KRIQLCC
!+N+Prop: NMN_KRIQLCC ;
!LEXICON PROP_KRIQLCC-PL
!+N+Prop: NMN_KRIQLCC-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_CHIOQLJ
!+N+Prop: NMN_CHIOQLJ ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_CHIOQLJ
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_CHIOQLJ ;

!LEXICON PROP_JIQLSSI
!+N+Prop: NMN_JIQLSSI ;
LEXICON PROP_PRSPRC-VXYY-I
+N+Prop: NMN_PRSPRC-VXYY-I ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_PESS
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_PESS ;



!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_SLOOHMAN
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_SLOOHMAN ;
LEXICON PROP_PESS
+N+Prop: NMN_PESS ;
LEXICON PROP_JARPLAAN
+N+Prop: NMN_JARPLAAN ;
LEXICON PROP_ATOM
+N+Prop: NMN_ATOM ;

LEXICON PROP_TUODDYR
+N+Prop: NMN_TUODDYR ;
LEXICON PROP_KOONTYR
+N+Prop: NMN_KOONTYR ;

LEXICON PROP_LUUBBYL
+N+Prop: NMN_LUUBBYL ;

LEXICON PROP_KOALVAK
+N+Prop: NMN_KOALVAK ;
!LEXICON PROP_AACCIKH
!+N+Prop: NMN_AACCIKH ;
LEXICON PROP_SAJOS
+N+Prop: NMN_SAJOS ;

!LEXICON PROP_IILYSKH
!+N+Prop: NMN_IILYSKH ;

!LEXICON PROP_SAQPPLI
!+N+Prop: NMN_SAQPPLI ;

!LEXICON PROP_OAQLGA !!= * @CODE@ Ååʹlga:Ååʹlg
!+N+Prop: NMN_OAQLGA ;

!LEXICON  PROP_SINIDA !!= * @CODE@ Sinida:Sinid
!+N+Prop: NMN_SINIDA ;


LEXICON PROP_SUYL
+N+Prop: NMN_SUYL ;
!LEXICON PROP-SEM/SUR_
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: # ;
!LEXICON PROP-SEM/FEM_
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: # ;


!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_TOLL
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_TOLL-PLC ;

LEXICON PROP_KUSS
+N+Prop: NMN_KUSS ;
!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_KUSS
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_KUSS-PLC ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_PAARR
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_PAARR ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_SIJDD
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_SIJDD ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_UHSS
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_UHSS ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_ALGG
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_ALGG ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_MUORR
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_MUORR ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_PUOAVV
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_PUOAVV ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_CHUOSHKK
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_CHUOSHKK ;

LEXICON PROP_PLAAN
+N+Prop: NMN_PLAAN ;
!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_PLAAN
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_PLAAN ;

LEXICON PROP_AELDD
+N+Prop: NMN_AELDD ;

LEXICON PROP_LOAQDD
+N+Prop: NMN_LOAQDD ;
!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_LOAQDD
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_LOAQDD ;


!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_CHAAQCC
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_CHAAQCC ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_JAUQRR
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_JAUQRR ;
LEXICON PROP_JAUQRR
+N+Prop: NMN_JAUQRR ;

LEXICON PROP_PEIQVV
+N+Prop: NMN_PEIQVV ;

LEXICON PROP_KAQLBB
+N+Prop: NMN_KAQLBB ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_JEAQNNN
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_JEAQNNN ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_VUEAIQVV
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_VUEAIQVV ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_KUYLAZH
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_KUYLAZH ;

!LEXICON PROP_PIISSUZH !!= * @CODE@ piissuž:piiss
!+N+Prop: NMN_PIISSUZH ;

!LEXICON PROP_HOQPPI 
!+N+Prop: NMN_HOQPPI ;

LEXICON PROP_RADIO
+N+Prop: NMN_RADIO ;

LEXICON PROP_OULU
+N+Prop: NMN_OULU ;

LEXICON PROP_MEERSAZH
+N+Prop: NMN_MEERSAZH ;

LEXICON PROP_KUYLAZH
+N+Prop: NMN_KUYLAZH ;

LEXICON PROP_AANAR
+N+Prop: NMN_AANAR ;
!+N+Prop: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
!+N+Prop:%^RmVow%>a SG-ILL ;
!+N+Prop:%^RmVow%>e SG-LOC ;
!+N+Prop:%^RmVow SG-COM_IN ;
!+N+Prop:%^RmVow%>e ESS/PAR ;

! 
!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_SUYL
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_SUYL ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_TUODDYR
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_TUODDYR ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_AANAR
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_AANAR ;

!LEXICON PROP_SOAOABBAR
!+N+Prop: NMN_SOAOABBAR ;


LEXICON PROP_SIJDD
+N+Prop: NMN_SIJDD ;


!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_SAJOS
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_SAJOS ;

LEXICON PROP_BIOLOGIA
+N+Prop: NMN_BIOLOGIA ;
!LEXICON PROP_BUKVA
!+N+Prop: NMN_BUKVA ;
LEXICON PROP_MERJA
+N+Prop: NMN_MERJA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-ani
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-fem
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: NMN_TRUUBA ;

LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-femplc
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_TRUUBA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-femsur
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_TRUUBA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-malfem
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_TRUUBA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-malsur
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_TRUUBA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-objplc
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: NMN_TRUUBA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON TEMPORARY
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON FirstTag
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: NMN_TRUUBA ;

LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA
+N+Prop: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_JOUSTE
+N+Prop: NMN_JOUSTE ;

!LEXICON PROP_TERHI
!+N+Prop: NMN_TERHI ;

LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: # ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_DIQLL
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom:%^PAL ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_DIQLL ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_HOQPPI
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_HOQPPI ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_IILYSKH
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_IILYSKH ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_AANAR
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_AANAR ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_JIQLSSI
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom:i ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_JIQLSSI ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_PEQLLJ
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom:%^PAL ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_PEQLLJ ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_KUYLAZH
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom:až ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_KUYLAZH ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_KAQLBB
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom:%^PAL ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_KAQLBB ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_NIJDD
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_NIJDD ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_AACCIKH
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_AACCIKH ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_SINIDA
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_SINIDA ;


LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_MEERSAZH
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom:až ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_MEERSAZH ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_SAQPPLI
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom:i ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_SAQPPLI ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_LOAQDD
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom:%^PAL ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_LOAQDD ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_OAQLGA
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_OAQLGA ;
!LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_AELDD
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_AELDD ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_MERJA
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_MERJA ;
LEXICON	 PROP_SEM/FEM_TERHI
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_TERHI ;
LEXICON	PROP_SEM/FEM_JOUSTE
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_JOUSTE ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_OULU
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_OULU ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/FEM_RADIO
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NMN_RADIO ;



LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: # ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;

LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_ATOM
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_ATOM ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_SAJOS
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_SAJOS ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_DIQLL
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:%^PAL ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_DIQLL ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_UULLA
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NMN_UULLA ;
